Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4484.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109z. Notwithstanding any rules, regulations, or guidelines promulgated by the department to the contrary, a speech-language pathologist may seek reimbursement for audiological rehabilitation and speech-language therapy services if the speech-language pathologist is licensed to practice in this state. This section applies regardless of whether the speech-language pathologist possesses a certificate of clinical competence.